Utah statutes.
58-44a-304.   Continuing education.
The division in collaboration with the board may establish by rule continuing
education requirements for renewal of licensure under this chapter, upon a
finding by the division that continuing education requirements are necessary
to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.
